dictionaries/lb/index.aff
FLAG long
SFX p2 N 30
SFX p2 n r/f6 [^t]en is:toponym is:masculine is:singular
SFX p2 n r [^t]en is:toponym is:masculine is:plural
SFX p2 n r [^t]en is:toponym is:adjective
SFX p2 ent ter ent is:toponym is:adjective
SFX p2 ent ter/f6 ent is:toponym is:masculine is:singular
SFX p2 ent ter ent is:toponym is:masculine is:plural
SFX p2 ef ëffer/f6 ef is:toponym is:masculine is:singular
SFX p2 ef ëffer ef is:toponym is:masculine is:plural
SFX p2 ef ëffer ef is:toponym is:adjective
SFX p2 usel iseler/f6 usel is:toponym is:masculine is:singular
SFX p2 usel iseler usel is:toponym is:masculine is:plural
SFX p2 usel iseler usel is:toponym is:adjective
SFX p2 olz ëlzer/f6 olz is:toponym is:masculine is:singular
SFX p2 olz ëlzer olz is:toponym is:masculine is:plural
SFX p2 olz ëlzer olz is:toponym is:adjective
SFX p2 atten ätter/f6 atten is:toponym is:masculine is:singular
SFX p2 atten ätter atten is:toponym is:masculine is:plural
SFX p2 atten ätter atten is:toponym is:adjective
SFX p2 and änner and is:toponym is:adjective
SFX p2 and änner/f6 and is:toponym is:masculine is:singular
SFX p2 and änner and is:toponym is:masculine is:plural
SFX p2 ann änner/f6 ann is:toponym is:masculine is:singular
SFX p2 ann änner ann is:toponym is:masculine is:plural
SFX p2 ann änner ann is:toponym is:masculine is:plural
SFX p2 n r/f6 hten is:toponym is:masculine is:singular
SFX p2 n r hten is:toponym is:masculine is:plural
SFX p2 n r hten is:toponym is:adjective
SFX p2 ariendall ärjendaller/f6 ariendall is:toponym is:masculine is:singular
SFX p2 ariendall ärjendaller ariendall is:toponym is:masculine is:plural
SFX p2 ariendall ärjendaller ariendall is:toponym is:adjective

SFX q1 N 2
SFX q1 n 0 n is:eifeler
SFX q1 en 0 en is:plural

SFX i4 N 2
SFX i4 en 0 en is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i4 en 0 en is:m2f is:feminine is:singular is:plural

SFX a5 N 7
SFX a5 0 en .
SFX a5 0 ener . is:er
SFX a5 0 enen . is:en
SFX a5 0 enem . is:em
SFX a5 0 ent . is:t
SFX a5 0 ene . is:en is:eifeler
SFX a5 0 e . is:eifeler

SFX b5 N 1
SFX b5 0 enst/a0 . is:superlative

SFX w1 N 42
SFX w1 fen aft afen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 ken akt aken is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 len alt alen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 len olt olen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 gen agt agen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 men amt amen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 nen ant anen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 fen oft ofen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 ren ort oren is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 sen öst ösen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 sen üst üsen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 zen uzt uzen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 ben abt aben is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 nen änt änen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 pen ipt ipen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 zen izt izen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 nen önt önen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 sen äst äsen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 gen ügt ügen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 sen ast asen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 pen apt apen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 zen azt azen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 nen ont onen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 men omt omen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 pen opt open is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 men ämt ämen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 gen ägt ägen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 pen upt upen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 len ält älen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 ken ikt iken is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 sen ost osen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 sen ust usen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 ken okt oken is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 fen uft ufen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 ben obt oben is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 zen ozt ozen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 ben übt üben is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 ren art aren is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 ben ibt iben is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 ven avt aven is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 len ilt ilen is:impe is:pl
SFX w1 en 0 en is:impe is:sg

SFX w0 N 15
SFX w0 en t [^djrtw]en is:impe is:pl
SFX w0 den t [^d]den is:impe is:pl
SFX w0 dden tt dden is:impe is:pl
SFX w0 en t [^äio]ren is:impe is:pl
SFX w0 ren ert [äio]ren is:impe is:pl
SFX w0 ën t ën is:impe is:pl
SFX w0 jen cht jen is:impe is:pl
SFX w0 wen ft wen is:impe is:pl
SFX w0 ën 0 ën is:impe is:sg
SFX w0 en 0 [^djw]en is:impe is:sg
SFX w0 den t [^d]den is:impe is:sg
SFX w0 dden tt dden is:impe is:sg
SFX w0 wen f wen is:impe is:sg
SFX w0 jen ch jen is:impe is:sg
SFX w0 en 0 ten is:impe is:pl

SFX g2 N 56
SFX g2 éien unn/c0 [^bck][lrz]éien is:papa
SFX g2 effen aff effen is:papa
SFX g2 eiwen iwwen/c0 eiwen is:papa
SFX g2 éngen uecht réngen is:papa
SFX g2 änken aangen/c0 fänken is:papa
SFX g2 annen onnt fannen is:papa
SFX g2 éissen oss éissen is:papa
SFX g2 eien äit heien is:papa
SFX g2 éngen ongen/c0 léngen is:papa
SFX g2 annen onnen/c0 [bpw]annen is:papa
SFX g2 oen aangen/c0 goen is:papa
SFX g2 énken onk énken is:papa
SFX g2 äichen ach äichen is:papa
SFX g2 ellen allt ellen is:papa
SFX g2 iechen ach iechen is:papa
SFX g2 äifen aff äifen is:papa
SFX g2 oen anen/c0 toen is:papa
SFX g2 éieren uer éieren is:papa
SFX g2 uelen oll huelen is:papa
SFX g2 ennen annt ennen is:papa
SFX g2 ënnen onnt ënnen is:papa
SFX g2 éien itt [bck][lhr]éien is:papa
SFX g2 eien ien/c0 [wz]eien is:papa
SFX g2 erfen orf werfen is:papa
SFX g2 etzen at etzen is:papa
SFX g2 eiden idden/c0 [lmn]eiden is:papa
SFX g2 ëtzen iess ëtzen is:papa
SFX g2 eelen uel efeelen is:papa
SFX g2 eelen uelen/c0 pfeelen is:papa
SFX g2 en l alen is:papa
SFX g2 äischen asch äischen is:papa
SFX g2 enken uecht enken is:papa
SFX g2 eeën uecht eeën is:papa
SFX g2 eisen isen/c0 eisen is:papa
SFX g2 ätzen at ätzen is:papa
SFX g2 aufen off aufen is:papa
SFX g2 äissen ass äissen is:papa
SFX g2 ieren uer wieren is:papa
SFX g2 ieden ueden/c0 ieden is:papa
SFX g2 auschen osch auschen is:papa
SFX g2 ären aart ären is:papa
SFX g2 ammen ommen/c0 ammen is:papa
SFX g2 iewen uewen/c0 [^v]iewen is:papa
SFX g2 ierwen uerwen/c0 ierwen is:papa
SFX g2 idden ueden/c0 idden is:papa
SFX g2 ëdden ott ëdden is:papa
SFX g2 eiden att hreiden is:papa
SFX g2 eiden idden/c0 treiden is:papa
SFX g2 auchen och auchen is:papa
SFX g2 ëllefen ollef ëllefen is:papa
SFX g2 ien eën/c0 leien is:papa
SFX g2 ussen issen/c0 ussen is:papa
SFX g2 nen ent hnen is:papa
SFX g2 en t viewen is:papa
SFX g2 éngen ongen/c0 wéngen is:papa
SFX g2 ieden att ieden is:papa

SFX o0 N 27
SFX o0 en ungen/v8 [^rs]oen is:pre
SFX o0 änken oungen/v8 änken is:pre
SFX o0 eeschen ouschen/v8 eeschen is:pre
SFX o0 inn oufen/v8 ginn is:pre
SFX o0 mmen umen/v8 mmen is:pre
SFX o0 alen oulen/v8 alen is:pre
SFX o0 inn ouchen/v8 sinn is:pre
SFX o0 eien ouchen/v8 eien is:pre
SFX o0 aachen ouchen/v8 aachen is:pre
SFX o0 iechen ouchen/v8 iechen is:pre
SFX o0 ëllen ollten/v8 ëllen is:pre
SFX o0 ëtzen ouzen/v8 ëtzen is:pre
SFX o0 éngen uechten/v8 éngen is:pre
SFX o0 ënnen onnten/v8 ënnen is:pre
SFX o0 enken uechten/v8 enken is:pre
SFX o0 ëssen oussten/v9 ëssen is:pre
SFX o0 ëssen ossten/v9 ëssen is:pre
SFX o0 oossen oussen/v8 oossen is:pre
SFX o0 alen oulen/v8 alen is:pre
SFX o0 éien uten/v9 éien is:pre
SFX o0 en ten/v9 roen is:pre
SFX o0 en ten/v9 soen is:pre
SFX o0 eiwen oufen/v8 eiwen is:pre
SFX o0 eiwen ouwen/c0 eiwen is:pre is:1pp
SFX o0 eiwen ouwen/c0 eiwen is:pre is:3pp
SFX o0 äerfen uerften/v8 äerfen is:pre
SFX o0 en ten/v8 ollen is:pre

SFX v8 N 10
SFX v8 en 0 en is:1ps
SFX v8 en s [^sz]en is:2ps
SFX v8 en 0 en is:3ps
SFX v8 0 0 en is:1pp
SFX v8 n 0 en is:1pp is:eifeler
SFX v8 en t [^t]en is:2pp
SFX v8 0 0 en is:3pp
SFX v8 n 0 en is:3pp is:eifeler
SFX v8 en 0 ten is:2pp
SFX v8 en 0 [sz]en is:2ps
